Wyoming, session 2025, HB0118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-1-159 is created to read:

34-1-159. Conveyances to the United States;
limitations.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0458
(i) "Property" means all interests in real
property located in Wyoming and shall include land, mineral
rights and water rights;

(ii) "United States" means the United States,
the federal government and any agency, department,
instrumentality or office of the federal government.

(b) No conveyance of property in Wyoming shall result
in a net gain of property to the United States.

Section 2. W.S. 36-1-105, 36-1-106, 36-1-110 and
36-9-101 by creating a new subsection (b) are amended to
read:

36-1-105. Exchange of land granted by federal
government.

Whenever, in the judgment of a majority of the members of
the board, the interests of the state will be advanced by
granting, conveying or deeding to the United States of
America, any lands which have been heretofore granted,
selected by, and patented to the state, then, in such case
HB0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0458
said board is hereby authorized and empowered to so grant,
convey and deed to the United States of America, such
lands. And the president of said board, and the director
are authorized and empowered to execute and deliver all
necessary instruments to complete such grant, or
conveyance; provided, always, that no such lands shall be
so granted, conveyed and deeded, unless the United States
of America shall, and will permit and allow this state to
select, and have patented to it, other lands in lieu of the
lands so reconveyed to the United States of America subject
to W.S. 36-1-111; provided, however, that the state shall
not give both surface and mineral rights with any lands
exchanged unless it receives the same from the federal
government. No exchange executed under this section shall
result in a net gain of surface rights or mineral rights to
the federal government.

36-1-106. Exchange of state-owned and federal-owned
lands.

The state of Wyoming, in accordance with the provisions of
the Taylor Grazing Act and other acts of congress
authorizing the exchange of federal-owned lands, is hereby
HB0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0458
authorized and empowered to exchange state-owned lands for
federal-owned lands, provided that no exchange under this
section shall result in a net gain of land to the federal
government.

36-1-110. Authority of director to effect and
complete exchanges.

The director is hereby authorized and empowered, subject to
the approval of the state board of land commissioners, to
effect and complete such exchange of state-owned lands for
federal-owned lands; and also to effect and complete such
exchange of state-owned lands for privately owned lands;
and to do any and all things necessary or required to be
done by the state of Wyoming in order to enable said state
to comply with the provisions of said Taylor Grazing Act
and other acts of congress authorizing the exchange of
federal-owned lands, and any order, rule or regulation
passed or promulgated in pursuance thereof; and to effect
and complete the exchange of state-owned lands for
privately-owned lands. The board of land commissioners may
authorize the purchase of lands only in an amount necessary
to effect and complete the exchange of state-owned lands
HB0118

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0458
for other lands and only for those lands identified in the
authorization of purchase. The board shall not use the
power of eminent domain pursuant to W.S. 1-26-801 et seq.
to purchase any lands under this section. No exchange of
lands under this section shall result in a net gain of land
to the federal government.

36-9-101. Authority; restrictions.

(b) No sale of state lands under this chapter shall
result in a net gain of land to the federal government.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all conveyances,
exchanges and sales of land and property executed on and
after the effective date of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0118